Hawaii statutes.
§195F-3 Establishment of the forest
stewardship program. (a) There is established a forest stewardship
program to be administered by the board to assist private landowners in
managing, protecting, and restoring important watersheds, native vegetation, timber
resources, fish and wildlife habitats, isolated populations of rare and
endangered plants, and other lands that are not recognized as potential natural
area reserves.

(b) The program shall reimburse landowners for
a portion of the landowners' total costs in developing and implementing
approved forest stewardship management plans pursuant to this chapter.

(c) The program shall assist in the forest
stewardship of public lands and in developing education and training programs
for sustainable forestry pursuant to section 195F-4(a)(2). [L 1991, c 327, pt
of §2; am L 1999, c 144, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next